Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
PART 2 Subdivisions

Cross references.

Regulation of sale of subdivided lands generally, §

44-3-1

et seq.

32-6-150.
“Subdivision” defined.

As used in this part, the term “subdivision” means all divisions of a tract or parcel of land into two or more lots, buildings, sites, or other divisions for the purpose, whether immediate or future, of sale, legacy, or building development; includes all division of land involving a new public road or a change in existing public roads or new drives, driveways, access ways, or changes that require access to the state right of way; includes resubdivision; and, where appropriate to the context, relates to the process of subdividing or to the land or area subdivided; provided, however, that the following are not included within this definition:

The combination or recombination of portions of previously platted lots where the total number of lots is not increased and the resultant lots are equal to the standards of the municipality; and

The division of land into parcels of five acres or more where no new street is involved.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-948, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 613, § 1.

32-6-151.
Department recommendation as to approval or rejection of a proposed subdivision plat abutting any part of or requiring access to the state highway system.

A planning commission shall submit two copies of the proposed subdivision plat to the department if such proposed subdivision includes or abuts on any part of the state highway system or where the proposed subdivision requires access to the state highway system. The department, within 30 days of receipt of the plat, shall recommend approval and note its recommendation on the copy to be returned to the planning commission or recommend rejection. Failure of the department to act within this 30 day period shall constitute approval. If the plat is recommended for rejection, the reasons for rejection and requirements for approval shall be given the commission in writing; such rejection shall be binding on the planning commission unless the planning commission, by official action recorded in its minutes, overrules such department action.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-949, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 613, § 2.

Cross references.

Regulation of sale of subdivided lands generally, §

44-3-1

et seq.

32-6-152.
Department approval or rejection of plat submitted by proprietor of subdivision abutting any part of or requiring access to the state highway system.

The proprietor of a subdivision to be developed within a county or municipality which has not created a planning commission shall submit three copies of the plat to the department if such a proposed subdivision includes or abuts on any part of the state highway system or where the proposed subdivision requires access to the state highway system. The department, within 30 days of receipt of the plan, shall approve or reject it, with written reasons for such rejection and requirements for approval, and note such action on the copy to be returned to the proprietor as well as on the copy to be returned to the county or municipal governing authority concerned. Such rejection shall be binding on the county or municipality concerned unless the county or municipal governing authority concerned, by official action recorded in its minutes, overrules such department action. Failure of the department to act within the 30 day period provided in this Code section shall constitute approval.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-950, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 613, § 3.

Cross references.

Regulation of sale of subdivided lands generally, §

44-3-1

et seq.

32-6-153.
Factors to be considered by department in making recommendations to planning commissions and in approving or rejecting plats.

Where the department is required to make recommendations to a planning commission under Code Section 32-6-151 or to approve a proposed plat under Code Section 32-6-152, the department, in addition to considering other factors, shall base its recommendation or approval on the following being provided for in the plat:

Dedication to the department in fee simple of any portion of the subdivision which includes any part of the state highway system, such dedication to include land necessary for future widening of the state highway system; and

An adequate provision for traffic safety in laying out public roads, drives, driveways, or access ways which enter the state highway system.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-951, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 613, § 4.

32-6-154.
Effect of part on requirement as to commercial driveway permit.

Nothing in this part shall dispense with the requirement of obtaining a commercial driveway permit as set forth in Part 1 of this article.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-952, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.